src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB_MOJAHTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 53 back t~d
!!€  mojahtaa: mojahtaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # smack
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:d  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KYNTÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 53 front t~n
!!€  kyntää: kyntää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # plow
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:nä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:n  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SORTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 53 back t~r
!!€  sortaa: sortaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # crush
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ra  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:r  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:re  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ret  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ret  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!!  Some of the a stems have t:s in past stems by ti>si variation.

LEXICON VERB_HUUTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 54 back
!!€  huutaa: huutaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # yell
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PYYTÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 54 front
!!€  pyytää: pyytää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # aks
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:dä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SIVALTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 54 back t~l
!!€  sivaltaa: sivaltaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # slash
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:la  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:le  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:let  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:let  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_VIHELTÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 54 front t~l
!!€  viheltää: viheltää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # whistle
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:lä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:le  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:let  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:let  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_HIVENTÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 54 front t~n
!!€  hiventää: hiventää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:nä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:net  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_HUONONTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 54 back t~n
!!€  huonontaa: huonontaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # worsen
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:na  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ne  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:net  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:net  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KUHERTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 54 back t~r
!!€  kuhertaa: kuhertaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # snuggle
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:ra  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:re  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ret  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ret  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 54 front t~r
!!€  näpertää: näpertää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # twiddle
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:rä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:re  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ret  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:ret  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!!  In some cases t:s variation is optionally alongside the regular gradation:


LEXICON VERB_KIITÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 55 front
!!€  kiitää: kiitää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # rush
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:dä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:d  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_JOUTAA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 55 back
!!€  joutaa: joutaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat 
0:ta  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:da  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_3SG_A  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0+Use/NG:s  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:s  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:d  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:det  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ta  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_YLTÄÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 55 front t~l
!!€  yltää: yltää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # reach
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:lä  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ä  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:s  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:l  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0+Use/NG:t  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:le  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:let  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:let  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:tä  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;
