src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
anteeksipyytää+V:anteeksipyy  VERB_PYYTÄÄ  ;
esiinhuutaa+V:esiinhuu  VERB_HUUTAA  ;
esillehuutaa+V:esillehuu  VERB_HUUTAA  ;
haivertaa+V:haiver  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
hajahtaa+V:hajah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
halventaa+V:halven  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
herkentää+V:herken  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
hervahtaa+V:hervah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
hiiltää+V:hiil  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
hiveltää+V:hivel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
hoipertaa+V:hoiper  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
hoitaa+V:hoi  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
hujeltaa+V:hujel  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
hulvahtaa+V:hulvah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
huojentaa+V:huojen  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
huultaa+V:huul  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
huutaa+V:huu  VERB_HUUTAA  ;
hypeltää+V:hypel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
hyytää+V:hyy  VERB_KIITÄÄ  ;
hyödyntää+V:hyödyn  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
hämärtää+V:hämär  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
häätää+V:hää  VERB_KIITÄÄ  ;
höyhentää+V:höyhen  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
imeltää+V:imel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
juontaa+V:juon  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
juurtaa+V:juur  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
jäsentää+V:jäsen  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
kaihertaa+V:kaiher  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
kajahtaa+V:kajah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
kangertaa+V:kanger  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
kaukosiirtää+V:kaukosiir  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
kavaltaa+V:kaval  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
kaventaa+V:kaven  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
keventää+V:keven  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
kieltää+V:kiel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
kiertää+V:kier  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
kihartaa+V:kihar  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
kiiltää+V:kiil  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
kiitää+V:kii  VERB_KIITÄÄ  ;
kilahtaa+V:kilah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
kilpasoutaa+V:kilpasou  VERB_JOUTAA  ;
kipertää+V:kiper  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
kirveltää+V:kirvel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
koheltaa+V:kohel  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
kuhertaa+V:kuher  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
kukertaa+V:kuker  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
kuohahtaa+V:kuohah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
kupertaa+V:kuper  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
kustantaa+V:kustan  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
kyntää+V:kyn  VERB_KYNTÄÄ  ;
kypsentää+V:kypsen  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
kähertää+V:käher  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
lauhentaa+V:lauhen  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
lentää+V:len  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
lepertää+V:leper  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
liitää+V:lii  VERB_KIITÄÄ  ;
likentää+V:liken  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
litsahtaa+V:litsah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
livertää+V:liver  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
longertaa+V:longer  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
läpipiirtää+V:läpipiir  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
löysentää+V:löysen  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
löytää+V:löy  VERB_PYYTÄÄ  ;
madaltaa+V:madal  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
mallintaa+V:mallin  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
mieltää+V:miel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
mojahtaa+V:mojah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
musertaa+V:muser  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
muuntaa+V:muun  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
möyhentää+V:möyhen  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
niukahtaa+V:niukah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
niveltää+V:nivel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
nyhertää+V:nyher  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
näivertää+V:näiver  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
pahentaa+V:pahen  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
painaltaa+V:painal  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
pehertää+V:peher  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
pilkahtaa+V:pilkah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
pimentää+V:pimen  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
pintaliitää+V:pintalii  VERB_KIITÄÄ  ;
pintasukeltaa+V:pintasukel  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
pipertää+V:piper  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
puhaltaa+V:puhal  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
pulahtaa+V:pulah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
punertaa+V:puner  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
pupeltaa+V:pupel  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
pyytää% anteeksi+V:anteeksipyy  VERB_PYYTÄÄ  ;
pyytää+V:pyy  VERB_PYYTÄÄ  ;
pyältää+V:pyäl  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
rakentaa+V:raken  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
rientää+V:rien  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
riippuliitää+V:riippulii  VERB_KIITÄÄ  ;
roihahtaa+V:roihah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
sisältää+V:sisäl  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
sivaltaa+V:sival  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
soitintaa+V:soitin  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
solahtaa+V:solah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
sopertaa+V:soper  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
sortaa+V:sor  VERB_SORTAA  ;
soutaa+V:sou  VERB_JOUTAA  ;
soveltaa+V:sovel  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
sulapuhaltaa+V:sulapuhal  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
sykertää+V:syker  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
säveltää+V:sävel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
taajentaa+V:taajen  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
taivaltaa+V:taival  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
takertaa+V:taker  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
tekstintää+V:tekstin  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
tiimeltää+V:tiimel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
toisintaa+V:toisin  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
tulvahtaa+V:tulvah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
tuultaa+V:tuul  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
tähdentää+V:tähden  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
uskaltaa+V:uskal  VERB_SIVALTAA  ;
uudentaa+V:uuden  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
vaapertaa+V:vaaper  VERB_KUHERTAA  ;
vavahtaa+V:vavah  VERB_MOJAHTAA  ;
vesiliirtää+V:vesiliir  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
viheltää+V:vihel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
vipeltää+V:vipel  VERB_VIHELTÄÄ  ;
vuotaa+V:vuo  VERB_HUUTAA  ;
väkertää+V:väker  VERB_NÄPERTÄÄ  ;
väärentää+V:väären  VERB_HIVENTÄÄ  ;
yliojentaa+V:yliojen  VERB_HUONONTAA  ;
yltää+V:yl  VERB_YLTÄÄ  ;
